Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 3. Alternative Fuel Taxes
§ 39-17-307.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month:

When alternative fuel is purchased to propel a motor vehicle or distributed in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed supplier, the supplier shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons sold in the state during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due for alternative fuel sold to an end user;

When alternative fuel is purchased out of Wyoming for use, sale or distribution to propel a motor vehicle in Wyoming, the Wyoming licensed supplier shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end user;

Each Wyoming licensed supplier with a Wyoming retail location shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons of alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end user or a retail location;

When alternative fuel is purchased in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed refiner, the refiner shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due for fuel sold to an end user;

Each Wyoming licensed distributor, importer, exporter with Wyoming retail locations shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons of alternative fuel imported and used to propel a motor vehicle during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end user or a retail location;

Each Wyoming licensed importer shall report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all gallons imported and used to propel a motor vehicle during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end user unless the tax has been paid to an out-of-state licensed supplier;

Any person acquiring biodiesel (B100), ethanol or other alcohols, methanol, butane or other blending components to blend with gasoline, diesel or alternative fuels shall report to the department all gallons of biodiesel (B100) ethanol or other alcohols, and methanol, butane or other blending components, purchased and blended during the preceding calendar month and remit all additional taxes due.

Each person transporting, conveying or bringing alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle into this state for sale, use or distribution in this state shall furnish the department a verified statement showing the number of gallons, using the appropriate equivalency formula, of alternative fuel delivered during the month preceding the report, the name of the person to whom the delivery was made and the place of delivery;

Each person who exports alternative fuel from this state shall report the number of gallons exported, using the appropriate equivalency formula, the destination state and the name of the person to whom exported;

On or before the last day of each month:

Each dealer, who is not licensed as a distributor, shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department showing the number of gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent of alternative fuel acquired, the person who supplied the alternative fuel and the total gallons or gallon equivalents sold during the preceding calendar month and remit any taxes due if the point of taxation is at the dispenser;

Each distributor or importer shall, if applicable, submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department for the preceding calendar month for the purpose of obtaining a refund from the department for taxes paid pursuant to this section.

A person shall not transport alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle by railroad tank car or transport truck unless the person has a shipping document for its transportation that complies with this section. A shipping document issued by a terminal operator or the operator of a bulk plant shall contain the following information:

The identification, including address, of the terminal or bulk plant from which the alternative fuel was received;

The date the alternative fuel was removed;

The amount of alternative fuel removed, indicating gross gallons and net gallons or the equivalent amount based on the gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent;

The destination state of the alternative fuel, as represented to the terminal operator by the transporter, the shipper or the shipper’s agent;

The name of the shipper of the alternative fuel within the bulk plant or terminal;

The consignee’s name and address;

The transporter’s name;

Any other information required by the department for the enforcement of this article.

A person to whom a shipping document was issued for the shipment of alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle shall:

Carry the shipping document in the conveyance for which it was issued when transporting the alternative fuel;

Show the shipping document to a law enforcement officer or authorized personnel of the department upon request;

Deliver the alternative fuel described in the shipping document to the destination state printed on it unless the person does all of the following:

Notifies the department when transporting the alternative fuel into a state other than the printed destination state that the person has received instructions for if the shipping document was issued to deliver the alternative fuel to a different destination state;

Writes on the shipping document the change in destination state;

Gives a copy of the shipping document to the distributor or other person to whom the alternative fuel is delivered.

A person to whom alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle is delivered by railroad tank car or transport truck shall not accept delivery of the alternative fuel if the destination state shown on the shipping document for the alternative fuel is a state other than Wyoming. The person to whom the alternative fuel is delivered shall examine the shipping document and keep a copy of the shipping document;

Each supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor and dealer shall keep and preserve records relating to the purchase and sale of alternative fuel for three (3) years. The department may, by rule and regulation, authorize alternate methods of preserving the records required under this section;

Each person transporting, conveying or importing alternative fuel into the state or producing, refining, manufacturing, blending or compounding and using, selling or distributing alternative fuel for sale or use in this state shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase or sale of alternative fuel for three (3) years;

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, each carrier licensed under the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement shall file, in a format required by the department, a report indicating the total number of miles traveled in all jurisdictions by the carrier’s vehicles subject to the tax under this article, the total number of miles traveled by those vehicles in this state, the amount of alternative fuel used by those vehicles in all jurisdictions, the amount of tax under this article paid during the calendar quarter and any other information required by the department to compute the carrier’s tax liability. The carrier shall pay all taxes due under this article at the time the report is filed. If the tax on alternative fuel imported in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Wyoming highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis, the department may approve and adopt that basis. In the absence of mileage records showing the number of miles actually operated per gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent of alternative fuel consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled.

Payment. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month every supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer and dealer shall pay to the department all license taxes imposed by this article which are due based upon the statement submitted under W.S. 39-17-307(a)(i). Payment may be made by electronic funds transfer;

The supplier, refiner or importer shall not require payment from the distributor of the license taxes imposed under this article until three (3) business days prior to the date which the taxes are required to be remitted to the state by the supplier, refiner or importer. A licensed distributor may elect to make delayed payments to a licensed supplier, refiner or importer, provided:

If the supplier, refiner or importer has an electronic funds transfer program in operation, the payment is made by electronic funds transfer; and

The distributor continues to make timely payments to the supplier, refiner or importer.

A distributor or importer who owns a bulk plant in this state may take a shrinkage credit of one percent (1%) on gross gallons, if applicable, of bulk alternative fuel purchased directly from a terminal and delivered in this state for use, sale or distribution. This credit may be claimed on the monthly tax return. A distributor or importer who does not own a bulk plant, but owns retail locations and distributes alternative fuel to those locations only shall be entitled to the shrinkage credit on gross gallons, if applicable, of bulk alternative fuel delivered. The shrinkage credit may not apply to some alternative fuels. The department shall promulgate rules which specify the applicability of the credit and provide an application process for the credit.

Timelines. The following shall apply:

Any report, claim, tax return, statement or other document or payments required or authorized by this article to be made or filed to or with the department and which is:

Transmitted through the United States mail is deemed filed and received by the department on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped on the envelope or other appropriate wrapper containing it;

Mailed but not received by the department or where received but the cancellation mark is illegible, erroneous or omitted, is deemed filed and received on the date mailed if the sender establishes it was deposited in the mail on or before the due date for filing and submits a duplicate within thirty (30) days following written notification by the department of the nonreceipt;

Received through electronic funds transfer is deemed to have been received when the electronic funds transfer transmission is received by the department;

Received through electronic data interchange is deemed to have been received when the electronic data interchange transmission is received by the department.

Any tax return or license application that is not signed and any tax return which does not contain all pertinent information is considered not filed until the licensee signs or supplies the required information to the department. If the information required in the documents is presented to the department in a format other than that prescribed or otherwise approved by the department, the tax return, application or claim for refund or credit shall be deemed not filed. The licensee shall have ten (10) days to provide the information requested in a manner prescribed or otherwise approved by the department. If the licensee provides the information requested by the department within ten (10) days, the tax return or license application shall be deemed to have been timely filed;

Evidence that correspondence was mailed from the department to the last known address of a person shall be deemed prima facie evidence that the person received the correspondence after five (5) business days have elapsed from the date the correspondence was mailed. As used in this section, “last known address” means the most current address on file with the department.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to define the reporting format requirement for all licensees.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-308.
Enforcement.

Audits. The following shall apply:

All tax returns and records are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies.

Interest. The license taxes and penalty shall be collected by the department together with interest of one percent (1%) per month on the license taxes from the due date until payment.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

Any person who conducts the business of a supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer, exporter or dealer without holding a valid license as specified in W.S.

39-17-306

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Each day in violation of the provisions of this section constitutes a separate offense;

If any person fails or refuses to file the monthly statement and remit the tax as provided by W.S. 39-17-307(a)(i), the department shall make a statement for that person from the best information available and from such statement shall determine the amount of license taxes required to be paid and add thereto a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the taxes due. The department shall notify the delinquent taxpayer of the total amount due by serving written notice upon such person personally or by United States mail to the last known address as shown on the records of the department. If the delinquent taxpayer proves to the department that the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause, the department shall waive the penalty provided in this paragraph. If the delinquent taxpayer after receiving the statement prepared by the department later renders to the department a true statement covering the same calendar month, the department shall use such statement, adding the penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest of one percent (1%) per month on the license taxes from the due date until payment. The penalty shall be waived by the department upon satisfactory written proof the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause;

Any person who fails to furnish any report or remit any license tax to the department as required by this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each offense is punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. In addition, the department may suspend or revoke any license held by the offender and may require the offender, as a condition of any future licensing under this article, to provide a surety bond, cash bond or certificate of deposit as provided by W.S.

39-17-306

(d);

Any supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor or dealer selling alternative fuel subject to the license taxes imposed by this article while delinquent in the payment of any such taxes is liable for double the amount due to be recovered in a suit instituted by and in the name of the state of Wyoming. Upon application made by the state a writ of injunction may be issued, without requiring bond, against the defendants enjoining and restraining them from selling or offering to sell in the state alternative fuel until the license taxes are paid. Upon application made by the state a receiver of the property and business of the defendant may be appointed to impound the same as security for the delinquent tax and any judgment recovered in the suit;

Any person who makes a false statement in a report required by this article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. In addition, the person shall forfeit all rights to a refund to the extent that the false statement resulted in a refund larger than that to which the person was lawfully entitled;

The department may revoke any license granted upon proof of violation of any provision of this article;

Any person violating any provision of this article, or who procures, aids or abets any person in a violation or noncompliance is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or both;

The Wyoming highway patrol and all peace officers of any county or municipality shall aid in the enforcement of this article.

Liens. There are no specific applicable provisions for liens for this article.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this article.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-309.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this article.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department concerning the assessment of fuel taxes may appeal to the state board of equalization. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board of equalization by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds for the appeal;

The department shall, in a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken;

Any person, including the department, aggrieved by any order issued by the state board of equalization may appeal the decision of the board to the first judicial district court in Laramie county;

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person aggrieved by the payment of taxes or any penalty or interest imposed by this article shall appeal a decision of the state board until all applicable taxes, penalties and interest have been paid.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month every distributor shall, if applicable, submit a statement to the department on forms furnished by or in a format required by the department for the preceding calendar month for the purpose of obtaining a refund from the department for taxes paid pursuant to W.S. 39-17-307(a)(i);

Any person exporting alternative motor vehicle fuel from Wyoming for which the license tax has been paid is subject to a refund of the license tax paid. The refund request shall be submitted on or before the last day of the month on forms provided by or in a format required by the department. The refund request is invalid if not submitted within one (1) year of the date of purchase;

Alternative fuel purchased for agricultural purposes as defined in W.S. 39-17-301(a)(ii) is qualified for a refund of the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(i) as declared by the applicant. Any person claiming a refund under this paragraph shall submit a record of purchases and shall specify the percentage of such purchases qualifying for the refund on a form provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing the bulk gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) or diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) purchased and license taxes paid. The department shall establish by rule the format for applying for the refund under this paragraph. The refund form and receipts shall be invalid if not submitted to the department within eighteen (18) months following the date of purchase. Not to exceed sixty (60) days following submission of the information required by this paragraph, the department shall issue a refund of the qualified alternative fuel license tax;

The department shall by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-302(a) prescribe procedures under which an alternative fuel user who is entitled to at least a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) refund of tax under this article for purchases and use of alternative fuel to propel a motor vehicle in any calendar month may apply for and receive the refund at any time after the last day of that month;

The license tax under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii) is subject to refund on all alternative fuel sold in Wyoming for transportation of people, goods and equipment in interstate commerce and used outside Wyoming, provided that there is an adequate system for determining whether or not the alternative fuel is used in Wyoming. Nothing in this paragraph shall apply to the use, sale or distribution for use of alternative fuel in Wyoming. The refund request is invalid if not submitted within one (1) year;

The license tax under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(i) is subject to refund as follows:

Alternative fuel purchased from a Wyoming licensed distributor or dealer by the University of Wyoming and community colleges and public schools located in Wyoming for use in a motor vehicle is subject to refund of the license tax. The record of purchases under this paragraph shall be submitted monthly by the purchaser on refund forms provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) or diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) purchased and license taxes paid. The refund form and receipts are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase;

Liquefied natural gas (LNG) or renewable diesel sold by a distributor, importer, supplier or dealer to the state of Wyoming or any of its political subdivisions is subject to a refund;

Liquefied natural gas, renewable diesel or compressed natural gas converted to liquefied natural gas at the point of delivery sold by a distributor, importer, supplier or dealer and used as heating fuel or to a person engaged in logging operations, mining operations, manufacturing, processing, drilling, exploration or well servicing, highway or other construction or railroad operations when the alternative fuel is consumed directly in logging operations, mining operations, manufacturing, processing, drilling, exploration or well servicing, highway or other construction or railroad operations, or other nonhighway operations or uses is subject to a refund. The record of purchases under this paragraph shall be submitted quarterly on a form provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing the gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent purchased and license taxes paid. The refund form and receipts shall be invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase. The department shall not deduct the state sales and use tax imposed by the provisions of W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-16-211

from the refund to any person who possesses a valid sales or use tax license under W.S.

39-15-106

or

39-16-106

, or if the person is exempt from paying sales or use taxes under W.S.

39-15-105

or

39-16-105

. A copy of the most recent sales or use tax report or proof that the person is exempt from sales or use taxes shall accompany the claim for refund.

Credits. Credit shall be given for tax paid in Wyoming on alternative fuel purchased to propel a motor vehicle but which is not used in Wyoming. The credit may be carried forward to succeeding reporting periods.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for escrow for this article.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The following shall apply” for “There are no specific applicable provisions for appeals for this article”; and added (b)(i) through (b)(iv).

§ 39-17-310.
Statute of limitations.

The refund form and receipts, as provided for in W.S.

39-17-309

are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase or eighteen (18) months for agricultural producers seeking refunds.

Each supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor and dealer shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase and sale of alternative fuels for not less than three (3) years. The department may authorize, by rule, alternate methods of preserving records required under this section.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-311.
Distribution.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, all alternative fuel license taxes and fees shall be distributed as follows:

All alternative fuel license taxes and fees received by the department under this article shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall credit them to the proper accounts as specified by the department and in paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

The state treasurer shall deposit all license fees under W.S.

39-17-306

into the state highway fund;

The department shall certify to the state treasurer amounts to be credited to appropriate accounts based upon deductions from the taxes collected under this article provided that the department shall deduct the pro rata share of the cost of collecting the taxes received from alternative fuel used for aircraft at any municipal or county airport and distribute the remainder to the city, town or county where the airport is located. These funds shall be used for the maintenance of the airport.

After certifying the amounts provided by paragraph (iii) of this subsection, the department shall certify the balance of taxes collected under this article to the state treasurer who shall distribute the remainder into the accounts within the state highway fund created under this subsection as follows:

Thirteen and one-half percent (13.5%) shall be distributed monthly to county treasurers. Each county treasurer shall credit such revenues to the county road fund for the improvement and maintenance of county roads. The distribution to each county shall be based on:

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the rural population including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the assessed valuation of the county bears to the last total assessed valuation of the state.

Fourteen percent (14%) shall be credited by the state treasurer to the county treasurers of the various counties for their road construction funds, except that an amount equal to the contribution required of the counties for the cost of the university’s technology transfer program under W.S. 21-17-115(a)(ii) or thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00), whichever is less shall be first distributed to the highway fund. Each county treasurer shall credit the revenues to the road construction fund in that county. The department shall allocate to each county a share based fifty percent (50%) upon the ratio which the rural population of each county including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state and fifty percent (50%) based on the ratio which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state. Any interest earned on invested funds allocated to counties shall be retained by each county and shall be used for project costs as provided by W.S. 24-2-110(a);

Fifteen percent (15%) shall be distributed as follows:

To the highway fund, an amount equal to the contribution required of the cities and towns for the cost of the university’s technology transfer program under W.S. 21-17-115(a)(iii) or thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00), whichever is less;

The remainder to be distributed monthly to incorporated cities and towns to be used in their street and alley programs as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) based on the taxes paid upon alternative fuel sold to and distributed by dealers located within each incorporated city and town;

Twenty-five percent (25%) in the ratio which the population of each city or town bears to the total population of all cities and towns.

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the assessed valuation of the county bears to the last total assessed valuation of the state.

Fifty-seven and one-half percent (57.5%) to the state highway account.

All taxes collected under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii) shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit them only into the state highway fund. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii). Any refund for any overpayment of the one cent ($.01) tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii) shall be taken from the taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii).

All alternative fuel license taxes and fees related to liquefied natural gas, biodiesel or renewable diesel shall be distributed as follows:

All alternative fuel license taxes and fees received by the department under this article related to liquefied natural gas, biodiesel or renewable diesel shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall credit them to the proper accounts;

The state treasurer shall deposit all license fees under W.S.

39-17-306

into the state highway fund;

All taxes collected under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(ii) related to liquefied natural gas, biodiesel or renewable diesel shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit them only into the state highway fund. The provisions of paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall not apply to the tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii). Any refund for any overpayment of the one cent ($.01) tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii) shall be taken from the taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii);

The state treasurer shall:

Deduct not to exceed two percent (2%) of the taxes collected under this article and distributed under this subsection corresponding to the actual cost of the administration of this article for the month and credit the money to the highway fund;

Distribute monthly the remainder as follows:

Twenty percent (20%) shall be distributed to county treasurers. Each county treasurer shall credit the revenues to the county road fund for the improvement and maintenance of county roads. The distribution shall be based on:

(1)

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state;

(2)

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the rural population including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state;

Five percent (5%) shall be distributed to incorporated municipalities based on the ratio that the total population of the municipality bears to the total population of all municipalities within the state. Each treasurer of a municipality shall credit the revenues to the municipal street fund for the improvement and maintenance of municipal streets;

The remaining revenues shall be credited to the state highway fund for the maintenance, construction and reconstruction of state highways.

Deduct the pro rata share of the cost of collecting the taxes received from alternative fuel used for aircraft at any municipal or county airport and distribute the remainder to the city, town or county where the airport is located. These funds shall be used for the maintenance of the airport.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(v) deleted “and W.S. 39-17-305(c)” following “this section.”